Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.180

Review of retirement account products proposed for inclusion in the Washington small business retirement marketplace.

The department of financial institutions, annually, or upon request of the department of commerce, must review individual retirement account products proposed for inclusion in the Washington small business retirement marketplace to confirm that the products comply with the requirements of RCW 43.330.735, except for those requirements that pertain to federal laws and regulations.

[ 2015 c 296 s 10.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2015 c 296: See RCW 43.330.912.